test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-3lex_almos_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - čavos: # MLO, ok; this is an adjective
    čavos+N+Sg+Nom: čaˊvos
    čavos+N+Sg+Gen: čappoos
    čavos+N+Sg+Acc: čappoos
    čavos+N+Sg+Ill: čaˊposân
    čavos+N+Sg+Loc: čaˊposist
    čavos+N+Sg+Com: čaˊposáin
    čavos+N+Sg+Abe: čappoosttáá
    čavos+N+Ess: [čaˊposin, čaˊvosin]
    čavos+N+Par: [čaˊposid, čaˊvosid]
    čavos+N+Pl+Nom: čaˊposeh
    čavos+N+Pl+Gen: čaˊposij
    čavos+N+Pl+Acc: čaˊposijd
    čavos+N+Pl+Ill: čaˊposáid
    čavos+N+Pl+Loc: čaˊposijn
    čavos+N+Pl+Com: čaˊposijguin
    čavos+N+Pl+Abe: čaˊposijttáá

  Noun - sajos: # MLO, ok
    sajos+N+Sg+Nom: saˊjos
    sajos+N+Sg+Gen: saijoos
    sajos+N+Sg+Acc: saijoos
    sajos+N+Sg+Ill: saˊj̣osân
    sajos+N+Sg+Loc: saˊj̣osist
    sajos+N+Sg+Com: saˊj̣osáin
    sajos+N+Sg+Abe: saijoosttáá
    sajos+N+Ess: saˊj̣osin #also saˊjosin as for the other stems?
    sajos+N+Par: saˊj̣osid #also saˊjosid as for the other stems?
    sajos+N+Pl+Nom: saˊj̣oseh
    sajos+N+Pl+Gen: saˊj̣osij
    sajos+N+Pl+Acc: saˊj̣osijd
    sajos+N+Pl+Ill: saˊj̣osáid
    sajos+N+Pl+Loc: saˊj̣osijn
    sajos+N+Pl+Com: saˊj̣osijguin
    sajos+N+Pl+Abe: saˊj̣osijttáá

  Noun - almos: # MLO, ok; this is an adjective
    almos+N+Sg+Nom: aˊlmos             
    almos+N+Sg+Gen: almoos
    almos+N+Sg+Acc: almoos
    almos+N+Sg+Ill: aˊlmosân
    almos+N+Sg+Loc: aˊlmosist
    almos+N+Sg+Com: aˊlmosáin
    almos+N+Sg+Abe: almoosttáá
    almos+N+Ess: aˊlmosin                
    almos+N+Par: aˊlmosid                
    almos+N+Pl+Nom: aˊlmoseh
    almos+N+Pl+Gen: aˊlmosij
    almos+N+Pl+Acc: aˊlmosijd
    almos+N+Pl+Ill: aˊlmosáid
    almos+N+Pl+Loc: aˊlmosijn
    almos+N+Pl+Com: aˊlmosijguin
    almos+N+Pl+Abe: aˊlmosijttáá
